Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1018
Board; powers and duties; compensation; budget; audit; reports.

It shall be the duty of the chairperson of the board of directors to keep in repair such works as are constructed by the district as authorized in sections 46-1001 to 46-1020 and to operate such works, all as directed by the board. Such works shall be operated in conformance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services relating to water supply systems. The chairperson and all persons who may perform any service or labor as provided in sections 46-1001 to 46-1020 shall be paid such just and reasonable compensation as may be allowed by the board of directors, and such board shall annually prepare an estimated budget for the coming year, adjust water rates, if necessary to produce sufficient revenue required by such budget, cause an annual audit of the district's records and accounts to be made, and make a report on such matters at each annual meeting.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 18, p. 755;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 263;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 206.